Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-542
Fish unlawfully taken; duty of angler.

All fish which cannot lawfully be taken shall be returned to the water at once with as little injury as possible, if taken, and before removing or attempting to remove such fish from the hook it shall be the duty of the angler to first wet his or her hands.

Laws 1929, c. 112, III, § 3, p. 415;

C.S.1929, § 37-303;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 6, p. 294;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-303;

R.S.1943, § 37-302;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-302;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 262.